Georgia, session 2025_26, SB18.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 45-7-4 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to annual salaries
of certain state officials and cost-of-living adjustments, is amended by revising
subparagraph (a)(22)(C) as follows:
"(C) In addition to any other compensation and allowances authorized for members of
the General Assembly, each member may be reimbursed for per diem differential and
for actual expenses incurred in the performance of duties as a member of the General
Assembly in an amount not to exceed $7,000.00 $33,000.00 per year for each senator
and not to exceed $11,000.00 per year for each representative. Expenses reimbursable
up to such amount shall be limited to one or more of the following purposes: lodging,
meals, per diem differential, postage, personal services, printing and publications, rents,
S. B. 18
- 1 -

LC 47 3212
supplies (including software), telecommunications, transportation, utilities, purchasing
or leasing of equipment, and other reasonable expenditures directly related to the
performance of a member's duties. If equipment purchased by a member has a
depreciated value of $100.00 or less when such member leaves office, the equipment
does not need to be returned to the state. No reimbursement shall be made for any
postage which is used for a political newsletter. No reimbursement shall be paid for
lodging or meals for any day for which a member receives the daily expense allowance
as provided in this paragraph. Eligible expenses shall be reimbursed following the
submission of vouchers to the legislative fiscal office in compliance with the
requirements of this subparagraph and subject to the provisions of subparagraph (E) of
this paragraph. Such vouchers shall be submitted in such form and manner as
prescribed by the Legislative Services Committee pursuant to subparagraph (E) of this
paragraph, provided that each such voucher shall be accompanied by a supporting
document or documents, or legible copies thereof, showing payment for each expense
claimed or an explanation of the absence of such documentation; in addition, each such
voucher shall include a certification by the member that the information contained in
such voucher and supporting document or documents, or legible copies thereof, is true
and correct and that such expenses were incurred by the member. The provisions of
Code Section 16-10-20 shall be applicable to any person submitting such certified
vouchers and supporting documents or copies the same as if the General Assembly
were a department or agency of state government. No such voucher or supporting
document shall be required for per diem differential."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 18
- 2 -